Mississippi, session 2026, SB2629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The segment of Mississippi Highway 32 located in Calhoun County, Mississippi, commencing at the eastern city limits of Bruce and extending east for a distance of one (1) mile, is designated and shall be known as the "Joe Tunnel Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section.     SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.